Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1843YC (3) 91 lh/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 225D.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. The department shall not accept new 3 applications for the program after June 30, 2025. 4 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 225D.3 Future repeal. 5 This chapter is repealed July 1, 2027. 6 Sec. 3. Section 514I.5, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 7 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 8 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (18) Applied behavior analysis services 9 for the treatment of autism spectrum disorder. 10 Sec. 4. AUTISM SUPPORT FUND ââ APPROPRIATION. 11 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary under 12 section 225D.2, there is appropriated from the autism support 13 fund created in section 225D.2 to the department of health and 14 human services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 15 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 16 as is necessary, for the purposes designated: 17 For maintenance of the healthy and well kids in Iowa (Hawki) 18 program pursuant to chapter 514I, including supplemental dental 19 services, for receipt of federal financial participation under 20 Tit. XXI of the federal Social Security Act, which creates the 21 childrenâs health insurance program: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750,000 23